Colorado, session 2026A, SB033.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Colorado's continued prosperity, affordability, environmental
stewardship, and public health depend on the timely, reliable, safe, and
community-supported deployment of clean and abundant energy
resources, including resources that provide firm, dispatchable, and
resilient power;
(b) Colorado is experiencing and anticipates further accelerated
demand for electricity and energy services driven by economic growth,
electrification, advanced manufacturing, and data-intensive industries,
which accelerated demand requires deliberate and coordinated planning
for new generation, storage, transmission, and enabling infrastructure;
(c) Colorado communities deserve early, meaningful, accessible,
and ongoing engagement regarding the siting and permitting of major
clean energy facilities and associated infrastructure, including clear
information about benefits, impacts, timelines, and safety and emergency
preparedness;
(d) Communities hosting clean energy facilities may realize
significant benefits, including high-quality jobs, workforce pathways,
-3- SB26-033

expanded tax bases, and supply chain development, but also may face
impacts that require mitigation, planning, and sustained partnership;
(e) Colorado's coal transition communities and communities with
brownfield sites have unique opportunities and needs and should be
prioritized for planning support, reuse of existing infrastructure, and
job-creating investment;
(f) Safety and emergency preparedness are fundamental to public
trust. For nuclear energy facilities, the federal government retains primary
authority for licensing and radiological safety, and Colorado's role is
coordination, preparedness, training, and public communication
consistent with federal law.
(g) Grid reliability and security, including physical security,
cybersecurity, fuel assurance, and security of long-term operations, must
be incorporated early into permitting readiness and community benefit
planning.
(2) Therefore, it is the intent of the general assembly to establish
statewide processes and structures that:
(a) Improve coordination and predictability of clean energy
permitting;
(b) Set minimum community engagement and benefit evaluation
requirements;
(c) Prioritize coal transition communities and brownfield site
redevelopment;
(d) Strengthen safety and emergency preparedness;
(e) Support grid reliability and security; and
(f) Ensure communities are at the forefront of consideration to
bring clean and abundant energy sources to Colorado for a prosperous
-4- SB26-033

and environmentally sustainable future for all.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 6 to article
38.5 of title 24 as follows:
PART 6
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY PERMITTING
COORDINATION OFFICE
24-38.5-601. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 6, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "APPLICATION COORDINATION MEETING" MEANS THE
COORDINATION MEETING DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-38.5-603 (1).
(2) "BROWNFIELD SITE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN 42 U.S.C.
SEC. 9601 (39), AS AMENDED.
(3) "CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 40-2-125.5 (2)(b)(II).
(4) "COAL TRANSITION COMMUNITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH
IN SECTION 8-83-502 (1).
(5) "COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT" OR "PROJECT" MEANS A
PROJECT FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, EXPANSION, REPOWERING, OR MATERIAL
MODIFICATION OF A CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCE FACILITY, INCLUDING
ASSOCIATED INTERCONNECTION AND ON-SITE ENABLING FACILITIES.
(6) "HOST COMMUNITY" MEANS A LOCAL GOVERNMENT:
(a) WITH JURISDICTION OVER A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT;
OR
(b) THAT THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECT DETERMINES IS LIKELY TO EXPERIENCE DIRECT AND SIGNIFICANT
IMPACTS FROM THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT DUE TO PROXIMITY,
-5- SB26-033

THE USE OF ACCESS ROUTES, OR CONSTRUCTION-RELATED IMPACTS,
INCLUDING ROAD CLOSURES AND NOISE IMPACTS.
(7) "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A CITY, COUNTY, CITY AND
COUNTY, SPECIAL DISTRICT, OR OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE.
(8) "MATERIAL MODIFICATION" MEANS A CHANGE TO A PROJECT
FACILITY OR SITE THAT IS REASONABLY LIKELY TO RESULT IN A
SIGNIFICANT CHANGE IN:
(a) NAMEPLATE GENERATING CAPACITY OR THERMAL OUTPUT;
(b) THE FACILITY OR SITE FOOTPRINT OR ON-SITE
INFRASTRUCTURE;
(c) SAFETY-RELATED SYSTEMS OR EMERGENCY PLANNING
ASSUMPTIONS; OR
(d) TRANSPORTATION, CONSTRUCTION, OR OPERATIONAL IMPACTS
TO A HOST COMMUNITY.
(9) "OFFICE" MEANS THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY PERMITTING
COORDINATION OFFICE CREATED IN SECTION 24-38.5-602 (1).
(10) "PERMITTING AUTHORITY" MEANS A STATE AGENCY, BOARD,
COMMISSION, DEPARTMENT, OFFICE, OR DIVISION THAT ISSUES, DENIES,
CONDITIONS, OR ENFORCES A STATE PERMIT, CERTIFICATION,
AUTHORIZATION, LEASE, RIGHT-OF-WAY, OR APPROVAL APPLICABLE TO A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT.
(11) "PUBLIC DASHBOARD" MEANS A PUBLIC DASHBOARD FOR AN
OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT, AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 24-38.5-610 (1).
24-38.5-602. Colorado clean energy permitting coordination
office - creation - duties.
-6- SB26-033

(1) THERE IS CREATED IN THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE THE
COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY PERMITTING COORDINATION OFFICE.
(2) THE DIRECTOR OF THE COLORADO ENERGY OFFICE SHALL
APPOINT THE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL:
(a) SERVE AS A SINGLE POINT OF CONTACT FOR OWNERS OR
OPERATORS OF A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT, LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, AND PERMITTING AUTHORITIES;
(b) ASSIST IN COORDINATING PERMIT APPLICATIONS FOR A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT;
(c) MAINTAIN PUBLIC DASHBOARDS;
(d) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO PERMITTING AUTHORITIES,
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, LOCAL PERMITTING OFFICES, AND FEDERALLY
RECOGNIZED TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS;
(e) DEVELOP MODEL COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT TERMS
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-606 (3); AND
(f) COORDINATE WITH WORKFORCE AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PARTNERS.
(4) THE AUTHORITY GRANTED TO THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO THIS
PART 6 DOES NOT PREEMPT THE AUTHORITY OF A PERMITTING AUTHORITY,
LOCAL GOVERNMENT, OR FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED TRIBE AND DOES NOT
SUPERSEDE FEDERAL JURISDICTION OVER NUCLEAR FACILITY LICENSING
AND RADIOLOGICAL SAFETY REGULATIONS.
24-38.5-603. Application coordination meeting - coordinated
permitting schedule.
(1) AT THE REQUEST OF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED
CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT OR HOST COMMUNITY, THE OFFICE SHALL
-7- SB26-033

CONVENE A MEETING TO COORDINATE THE FILING OF APPLICATIONS FOR
PERMITS FOR THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT, WHICH MEETING MAY
ALSO INCLUDE RELEVANT PERMITTING AUTHORITIES AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS, FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS, AND
UTILITIES, AS APPLICABLE.
(2) FOLLOWING AN APPLICATION COORDINATION MEETING, THE
OFFICE SHALL PREPARE A COORDINATED PERMITTING SCHEDULE FOR THE
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT THAT IDENTIFIES, TO THE EXTENT
KNOWN, THE FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT PERMITS AND
APPROVALS LIKELY TO BE REQUIRED, KEY INFORMATION NEEDS,
ANTICIPATED REVIEW MILESTONES, AND OPPORTUNITIES FOR CONCURRENT
REVIEW BY PERMITTING AUTHORITIES AND OTHER PARTIES REVIEWING
PERMIT APPLICATIONS.
(3) TO THE GREATEST EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND CONSISTENT
WITH APPLICABLE LAW, IN REVIEWING AN APPLICATION FOR A COVERED
CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT, PERMITTING AUTHORITIES SHALL COORDINATE
THEIR REVIEWS, SHARE NONCONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION WITH EACH
OTHER, AND IDENTIFY A SINGLE POINT OF CONTACT. A COORDINATED
PERMITTING SCHEDULE IS INFORMATIONAL AND DOES NOT MODIFY
APPLICABLE LAW.
(4) THE OFFICE MAY:
(a) FACILITATE ISSUE RESOLUTION AMONG THE PARTIES
PARTICIPATING IN AN APPLICATION COORDINATION MEETING AND OTHER
PARTIES INVOLVED IN THE REVIEW OF PERMIT APPLICATIONS FOR A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT; AND
(b) PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE ON PROCESS AND
SEQUENCING FOR A PROJECT.
-8- SB26-033

(5) THE OFFICE SHALL NOT DIRECT THE OUTCOME OF ANY
PERMITTING DECISION.
24-38.5-604. Local government and tribal participation - best
practices.
(1) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT OR FEDERALLY RECOGNIZED TRIBAL
GOVERNMENT MAY PARTICIPATE IN ACTIVITIES DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 6
ON A VOLUNTARY BASIS.
(2) THE OFFICE SHALL MODEL BEST PRACTICES FOR LOCAL
PERMITTING COORDINATION, INCLUDING STANDARDS FOR TRANSPARENT
SCHEDULES, CONSOLIDATED PUBLIC INFORMATION, AND ALIGNMENT OF
ENGAGEMENT PROCESSES WHERE FEASIBLE.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS PART 6 LIMITS OR EXPANDS LOCAL LAND USE
AUTHORITY OR TRIBAL SOVEREIGNTY.
24-38.5-605. Community engagement plans.
(1) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT SHALL SUBMIT A COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT PLAN TO THE OFFICE AND TO THE RELEVANT PERMITTING
AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES. A PERMITTING AUTHORITY MAY DEEM AN
APPLICATION INCOMPLETE UNTIL A COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PLAN IS
SUBMITTED TO THE PERMITTING AUTHORITY.
(2) (a) UNLESS GRANTED AN EXTENSION PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS SECTION, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT SHALL SUBMIT A COMMUNITY
ENGAGEMENT PLAN TO THE OFFICE AND TO THE APPLICABLE PERMITTING
AUTHORITY OR AUTHORITIES AT LEAST NINETY DAYS BEFORE THE OWNER
OR OPERATOR SUBMITS THE FIRST STATE PERMIT APPLICATION FOR THE
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT.
-9- SB26-033

(b) THE OFFICE MAY GRANT AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT AN EXTENSION TO SUBMIT A
COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PLAN FOR GOOD CAUSE SHOWN.
(3) AT A MINIMUM, A COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PLAN MUST:
(a) IDENTIFY HOST COMMUNITIES;
(b) DESCRIBE AT LEAST TWO PUBLIC MEETINGS THAT THE OWNER
OR OPERATOR OF THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT HAS CONDUCTED
OR WILL BE CONDUCTING, WHICH MEETINGS MUST BE AT ACCESSIBLE
TIMES AND LOCATIONS, ALLOW REMOTE ACCESS, AND PROVIDE DISABILITY
ACCOMMODATIONS;
(c) DESCRIBE THE OWNER OR OPERATOR'S PLAN TO PROVIDE
TIMELY INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROJECT THROUGH A WEBSITE AND A
QUESTION-AND-RESPONSE MECHANISM THROUGH THE WEBSITE;
(d) IDENTIFY A COMMUNITY LIAISON; AND
(e) DESCRIBE HOW COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT WILL BE
DOCUMENTED AND SUMMARIZED BY THE OWNER OR OPERATOR.
24-38.5-606. Community benefit agreements.
(1) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT SHALL PREPARE A COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENT AND SUBMIT THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT TO THE
OFFICE AND TO THE PARTIES PARTICIPATING IN THE APPLICATION
COORDINATION MEETING, IF ANY.
(2) AT A MINIMUM, A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT MUST
ADDRESS THE FOLLOWING CONCERNING THE PROJECT:
(a) JOBS AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT;
(b) TAX AND FISCAL IMPACTS;
(c) SUPPLY CHAIN NEEDS AND COLORADO PROCUREMENT
-10- SB26-033

OPPORTUNITIES;
(d) COMMUNITY IMPACTS AND MITIGATION, INCLUDING HOUSING
AND TRANSPORTATION IMPACTS DURING CONSTRUCTION;
(e) LONG-TERM OPERATIONS, MAINTENANCE, DECOMMISSIONING,
AND SITE RESTORATION CONCEPTS; AND
(f) SAFETY AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS SUPPORT.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP MODEL COMMUNITY BENEFIT
AGREEMENT TERMS FOR A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT, WHICH THE
OFFICE SHALL POST ON THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT'S PUBLIC
DASHBOARD OR THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE IF THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECT DOES NOT HAVE A PUBLIC DASHBOARD.
(4) FOR COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECTS LOCATED IN COAL
TRANSITION COMMUNITIES OR ON BROWNFIELD SITES OR FOR WHICH THE
OWNER OR OPERATOR SEEKS STATE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE, THE OWNER
OR OPERATOR OF THE PROJECT SHALL NEGOTIATE IN GOOD FAITH TOWARD
EXECUTING A SIGNED COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT WITH HOST
COMMUNITIES.
(5) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT MAY ADDRESS, AS
APPLICABLE, LOCAL BUSINESS OPPORTUNITIES, INCLUDING OPPORTUNITIES
FOR SMALL AND DIVERSE BUSINESSES; WORKFORCE STANDARDS AND
PATHWAYS, INCLUDING APPRENTICESHIP UTILIZATION AND TARGETED
HIRING; WORKER SAFETY TRAINING EXPECTATIONS; COMMUNITY
INVESTMENTS AND MITIGATION; EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT SUPPORT; AND
MEASURABLE REPORTING COMMITMENTS.
(6) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES A PERMITTING AUTHORITY
TO DENY A PERMIT SOLELY BECAUSE A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT
HAS NOT BEEN EXECUTED, BUT THE PERMITTING AUTHORITY MAY
-11- SB26-033

CONSIDER THE LACK OF AN EXECUTED COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT
TO THE EXTENT THE PERMITTING AUTHORITY IS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED
BY LAW TO CONSIDER COMMUNITY IMPACTS AND MITIGATION.
24-38.5-607. Coal community and brownfield priority -
inventory.
(1) THE OFFICE SHALL PRIORITIZE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND
PERMITTING READINESS SUPPORT FOR COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECTS
THAT REPOWER OR REUSE RETIRED OR RETIRING FOSSIL FUEL GENERATION
SITES, ARE LOCATED IN COAL TRANSITION COMMUNITIES, OR ARE LOCATED
ON BROWNFIELD SITES.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, THE OFFICE SHALL PUBLISH
ON THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE AND UPDATE ANNUALLY AN INVENTORY
IDENTIFYING COAL PLANT AND INDUSTRIAL SITES AND BROWNFIELD SITES
SUITABLE FOR REDEVELOPMENT FOR CLEAN ENERGY RESOURCE FACILITIES
AND OTHER KEY INFRASTRUCTURE CONSIDERATIONS. THE INVENTORY IS
INFORMATIONAL AND DOES NOT DESIGNATE OR COMPEL A LOCATION FOR
THE SITING OF A COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT.
24-38.5-608. Safety and emergency preparedness plans.
(1) EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT SHALL:
(a) DEVELOP AND SUBMIT TO THE OFFICE A SAFETY AND
EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN PROPORTIONATE TO PROJECT TYPE,
SCALE, AND RISK; AND
(b) COORDINATE WITH RELEVANT LOCAL EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT AGENCIES AND THE DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND
EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1603 IN
IMPLEMENTING THE SAFETY AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN.
-12- SB26-033

(2) A SAFETY AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS PLAN DEVELOPED
BY AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY PROJECT MUST
DESCRIBE COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL LICENSING AND EMERGENCY
PLANNING PROCESSES, TRAINING AND EXERCISE NEEDS FOR LOCAL FIRST
RESPONDERS AND EMERGENCY MANAGERS, COMMUNICATIONS
PROTOCOLS, AND PROPOSED SUPPORT FOR LOCAL PREPAREDNESS
CAPABILITY.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL POST A SAFETY AND EMERGENCY
PREPAREDNESS PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION ON THE COVERED CLEAN ENERGY
PROJECT'S PUBLIC DASHBOARD OR THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE IF THE COVERED
CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT DOES NOT HAVE A PUBLIC DASHBOARD.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS PART 6 SUPERSEDES THE AUTHORITY OF THE
FEDERAL NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION OR OTHER FEDERAL
AGENCIES WITH JURISDICTION OVER NUCLEAR FACILITY LICENSING,
SAFETY, OR SECURITY.
24-38.5-609. Grid reliability and security statement -
coordination with public utilities commission and utilities.
(1) EFFECTIVE NOVEMBER 1, 2027, AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT SHALL SUBMIT TO THE OFFICE A GRID
RELIABILITY AND SECURITY STATEMENT DESCRIBING INTERCONNECTION
STATUS, EXPECTED CONTRIBUTION TO GRID RELIABILITY AND RESILIENCE,
CYBERSECURITY AND PHYSICAL SECURITY PRACTICES APPROPRIATE TO
CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, AND LONG-TERM OPERATIONS AND
MAINTENANCE PLANNING.
(2) THE OFFICE SHALL COORDINATE WITH THE PUBLIC UTILITIES
COMMISSION AND UTILITIES AS APPROPRIATE TO ALIGN PERMITTING
-13- SB26-033

READINESS WITH GRID RELIABILITY NEEDS.
24-38.5-610. Public dashboard - annual report - metrics.
(1) THE OFFICE SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A PUBLIC
DASHBOARD ON THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE FOR AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A
COVERED CLEAN ENERGY PROJECT THAT RECEIVES A COORDINATED
PERMITTING SCHEDULE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-603 (2) OR THAT
RECEIVES STATE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FROM THE OFFICE.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE
ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES AND THE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE
OF THE SENATE, OR ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, SUMMARIZING
PROGRAM METRICS, COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT LESSONS LEARNED, COAL
COMMUNITY AND BROWNFIELD SITE READINESS ACTIVITIES, GRID
RELIABILITY AND SECURITY STATEMENTS SUBMITTED TO THE OFFICE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-38.5-609 (1), SAFETY AND EMERGENCY
PREPAREDNESS COORDINATION ACTIVITIES, AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR
IMPROVEMENTS.
24-38.5-611. Repeal of part - sunset review.
(1) THIS PART 6 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2031.
(2) BEFORE THE REPEAL, THIS PART 6 IS SCHEDULED FOR REVIEW
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(32)(a)(XVI) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies
and functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
-14- SB26-033

declaration - repeal.
(32) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2031:
(XVI) THE COLORADO CLEAN ENERGY PERMITTING COORDINATION
OFFICE CREATED IN SECTION 24-38.5-602 (1).
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to covered clean energy projects proposed on
or after the applicable effective date of this act.
-15- SB26-033